Hawaii statutes.
§653-6 Garnishee summons. (a) Any
provision to the contrary notwithstanding, no garnishee summons shall be issued
before judgment until the creditor upon motion and after hearing has proved to
the satisfaction of the court any of the following allegations:

(1) That the defendant debtor is not a resident of
the State and may depart from the State within six months from the date of
filing of the action;

(2) That the defendant debtor has departed from the
State;

(3) That the defendant debtor has left the county of
the defendant debtor's residence with intent to avoid service of summons; or

(4) That the defendant debtor, although a resident of
the State, intends to depart from the State and remain absent therefrom for a
period in excess of nine months.

If the ruling of the court is in favor of the
creditor on any of the allegations above enumerated before judgment or if the
creditor has received judgment in the creditor's favor on the creditor's
complaint, the creditor may then request the court issuing the garnishee
summons to direct that service of a true and attested copy be made in any of
the manners described under section 653-7 upon the comptroller of the State, or
of the political or municipal subdivision of the State, or other officer
through whom the salary, stipend, or wages of the debtor is sought to be
attached, who shall be referred to as the garnishee for purposes of this
chapter.

(b) In any action brought in the district
court by a creditor upon a debtor, the creditor, ten days after judgment
rendered in the creditor's favor, in lieu of requesting the issuance of a
garnishee summons, may file a certified copy of the judgment and the creditor's
affidavit as to the amount due and unpaid on account of the judgment with the
comptroller of the State, or of the political or municipal subdivision of the
State or other officers through whom the salary, stipend, or wages of the
judgment debtor is paid, and upon that filing the comptroller or other officer
shall withhold from the wages of the judgment debtor the amounts provided in
section 652-1(a) subject to payment in good faith as provided in section
652-1(f) and pay the same to the judgment creditor. [L 1890, c 50, §4; am L
1903, c 53, §3; am L 1921, c 66, §1; RL 1925, §2849; RL 1935, §4295; RL 1945,
§10326; RL 1955, §238-6; am L 1959, c 65, §6; am L 1961, c 167, §4; am L 1963,
c 85, §3; HRS §653-6; gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 123, §5 and c 211, §10; am L
1990, c 281, §11; am L 1992, c 82, §3]

Case Notes

Cited: 33 H. 602, 604 (1935).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next